Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Chapter 6 Consultation Committee [Repealed]

§§ 28-6-101 through 28-6-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 191, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to legislative support from the legislative service office, see §

28-8-104

. As to the select committee on capital financing and investments, see §

28-11-201

.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1919, ch. 2, §§ 1 through 4, related to the consultation committee to the legislature.